Hawaii statutes.
§671-13 Medical inquiry and conciliation
panel proceedings; voluntary settlement. [(a)] Every inquiry regarding a
medical tort shall be processed by the medical inquiry and conciliation panel
within thirty days after the last date for filing a response. No persons other
than the panel, witnesses, and consultants called by the panel, and the persons
listed in section 671-14 shall be present except with the permission of the
chairperson. The panel may, in its discretion, conduct an inquiry of a party,
witness, or consultant without the presence of any or all parties.

[(b)] The proceedings shall be informal.
Chapters 91 and 92 shall not apply. The panel may require a stenographic
record of all or part of its proceedings for the use of the panel, but the
record shall not be made available to the parties. The panel may receive any
oral or documentary evidence. The panel shall conduct proceedings in a manner
appropriate to the circumstances of the inquiry and to facilitate resolution of
the matter. The panel shall conduct proceedings in a non-adversarial manner
consistent with the primary purpose of conciliation.

[(c)] The panel shall have the power to
require by subpoena the appearance and testimony of witnesses and the
production of documentary evidence. When the subpoena power is utilized,
notice shall be given to all parties. The testimony of witnesses may be taken
either orally before the panel or by deposition. In cases of refusal to obey a
subpoena issued by the panel, the panel may invoke the aid of any circuit court
in the State, which may issue an order requiring compliance with the subpoena.
Failure to obey an order may be punished by the court as a contempt thereof.
Any member of the panel, the director of commerce and consumer affairs, or any
person designated by the director may sign subpoenas. Any member of the panel
may administer oaths and affirmations, examine witnesses, and receive
evidence. Notwithstanding these powers, the panel shall attempt to secure the
voluntary appearance, testimony, and cooperation of parties, witnesses, and
consultants without coercion.

[(d)] At panel proceedings and to assist its
conciliation role, the panel may consider, but not be limited to, statements or
testimony of witnesses, hospital and medical records, nurses' notes, x-rays,
and other records kept in the usual course of the practice of the health care
provider without the necessity for other identification or authentication,
statement of fact, or opinion on a subject contained in a published treatise,
periodical, book, or pamphlet, or statements of experts without the necessity
of the experts appearing at the proceeding. The panel may upon the application
of any party or upon its own decision appoint as a consultant, an impartial and
qualified physician, surgeon, physician and surgeon, or other professional
person or expert to testify before the panel or to conduct any necessary
professional or expert examination of the party initiating the inquiry or
relevant evidentiary matter and to report to or testify as a witness thereto.
The consultant shall not be compensated or reimbursed except for travel and
living expenses to be paid as provided in section 671-11. Except for the
production of hospital and medical records, nurses' notes, x-rays, and other
records kept in the usual course of the practice of the health care provider,
discovery by the parties shall not be allowed.

[(e)] During the proceedings or at any time
before termination, the panel may encourage the parties to settle or otherwise
dispose of the inquiry voluntarily. [L 1976, c 219, pt of §2; am L 1979, c 80,
§2; am L 1983, c 223, §5; am L 1988, c 132, §1; am L 1989, c 245, §2; am L
2012, c 296, pt of §4]

Case Notes

Only members of a medical claim conciliation panel are
authorized to sign subpoenas and only the panel can seek assistance of the
circuit court for compliance with such subpoenas. 69 H. 419, 744 P.2d 1205
(1987).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next